fi: Leikkausveitsen terän muoto: Kaareva; Suorat; Muu
pt-BR: Formato da lâmina do bisturi: Curvada; Liso; Outro
hr-HR: Oblik oštrice skalpela: Zaobljeni; Ravni; Ostalo
nb: Skalpellbladform: Buet; Rett; Annet
ru: Форма лезвия скальпеля: Изогнутый; Прямой; Другой
da: Skalpelbladform: Buet; Lige; Andet
el: Σχήμα λεπίδας νυστεριού: Καμπυλωτή; Ευθεία; Άλλο
vi: Hình dạng lưỡi dao mổ: Cong; Tóc thẳng; Khác
de: Form der Skalpellklinge: Gebogen; Glatt; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Oblika rezila skalpela: Ukrivljeno; Ravno; Drugo
sk-SK: Tvar čepele skalpelu: Zaoblený; Rovný; Iné
es: Forma de la hoja de bisturí: Curva; Liso; Otros
pl: Kształt ostrza skalpela: Zakrzywiony; Prosta; Inne
tr: Neşter bıçağı şekli: Kavisli; Düz; Diğer
bg-BG: Форма на острието на скалпела: Извит; Прав; Други
en: Scalpel blade shape: Curved; Straight; Other
hu: Szikepenge alakja: Ívelt; Egyenes; Egyéb
fr: Forme de la lame du scalpel: Incurvée; Lisses; Autre
ja: メス刃形状: カーブド; ストレート; その他
ko: 메스날 모양: 곡선형; 일자형; 기타
ro-RO: Formă lamă de bisturiu: Curbată; Dreaptă; Altele
cs: Tvar čepele skalpelu: Zaoblený; Rovné; Jiné
it: Forma della lama di bisturi: Curvo; Dritto; Altro
th: รูปร่างใบมีดผ่าตัด: โค้ง; ผมตรง; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 手術刀片形狀: 弧形; 直; 其他
zh-CN: 手术刀刀片形状: 弯曲的; 直; 其他
pt-PT: Forma da lâmina do bisturi: Curvado; Liso; Outro
nl: Vorm scalpelmesje: Gebogen; Steil; Andere
lt-LT: Skalpelio ašmenų forma: Lenktas; Tiesus; Kita
sv: Form på skalpellblad: Böjd; Rakt; Övrigt